Maine, session 132, LD539.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §959, sub-§1, ¶I, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §1,
is further amended to read:
I. The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over labor
matters shall use the following list as a guideline for scheduling reviews:
(2) Department of Labor in 2023;
(3) Maine Labor Relations Board in 2025; and
(4) Workers' Compensation Board in 2025; and.
(5) The paid family and medical leave benefits program established in Title 26,
chapter 7, subchapter 6‑C in 2029.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§54-F, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§2, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §42, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §3, is further
amended to read:
§42. Powers and duties
The bureau shall collect, assort and arrange statistical details relating to all departments
of labor and industrial pursuits in the State; to trade unions and other labor organizations
and their effect upon labor and capital; to the number and character of industrial accidents
and their effect upon the injured, their dependent relatives and upon the general public; to
other matters relating to the commercial, industrial, social, educational, moral and sanitary
conditions prevailing within the State, including the names of firms, companies or
corporations, where located, the kind of goods produced or manufactured, the time operated
each year, the number of employees classified according to age and sex and the daily and
average wages paid each employee; and the exploitation of such other subjects as will tend
to promote the permanent prosperity of the industries of the State. The director is authorized
and empowered, subject to the approval of the Governor, to accept from any other agency
of government, individual, group or corporation such funds as may be available in carrying
out this section, and meet such requirements with respect to the administration of such
funds, not inconsistent with this section, as are required as conditions precedent to receiving
such funds. An accounting of such funds and a report of the use to which they were put
Page 1 - 132LR0764(01)

412 must be included in the biennial report to the Governor. Each agency of government shall
423 cooperate fully with the bureau's efforts to compile labor and industrial statistics. The
434 director shall cause to be enforced all laws regulating the employment of minors; all laws
445 established for the protection of health, lives and limbs of operators in workshops and
456 factories, on railroads and in other places; all laws regulating the payment of wages; and
467 all laws enacted for the protection of the working classes. During an investigation to
478 enforce those laws, the director may request records and other information relating to an
489 employer's compliance with unemployment compensation and workers' compensation
590 laws, including information needed to determine whether the employer has properly
1501 classified a worker as an independent contractor, and shall report suspected violations of
1512 those laws to the state or federal agency responsible for enforcing them. The director may
1523 adopt, in accordance with the Maine Administrative Procedure Act, rules regarding all such
1534 laws, except where this authority is granted to a board or commission. Rules adopted
1545 pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
1556 subchapter 2‑A. The director shall, on or before the first day of July, biennially, report to
1567 the Governor, and may make such suggestions and recommendations as the director may
1578 deem necessary for the information of the Legislature. The director may from time to time
1589 cause to be printed and distributed bulletins upon any subject that is of public interest and
1690 benefit to the State, including, but not limited to, the paid family and medical leave benefits
2601 program established in chapter 7, subchapter 6‑C, and may conduct a program of research,
2612 education and promotion to reduce industrial accidents. The director may review various
2623 data, such as workers' compensation records, as well as other information relating to any
2634 public or private employer's safety experience. When any individual public or private
2645 employer's safety experience causes the director to question seriously the safe working
2656 environment of that employer, the director may offer any safety education and consultation
2667 programs to that employer that may be beneficial in providing a safer work environment.
2678 If the employer refuses this assistance or is in serious noncompliance which that may lead
2689 to injuries, or if serious threats to worker safety continue, then the director shall
2790 communicate concerns to appropriate agencies, such as the United States Occupational
3701 Safety and Health Administration. As used in this section, the term "noncompliance"
3712 means a lack of compliance with any applicable health and safety regulations of the United
3723 States Occupational Safety and Health Administration or other federal agencies. The
3734 bureau is responsible for the enforcement of indoor air quality and ventilation standards
3745 with respect to state-owned buildings and buildings leased by the State. The bureau shall
3756 enforce air quality standards in a manner to ensure that corrections to problems found in
3767 buildings be made over a reasonable period of time, using consent agreements and other
3778 approaches as necessary and reasonable.
The director may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states that maximize
compliance with employment standards enforced by the director.
Sec. 4. 26 MRSA §42-B, sub-§1, ¶F, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§4, is further amended to read:
F. Minimum wage and overtime provisions as described in section 664; and
Sec. 5. 26 MRSA §42-B, sub-§1, ¶G, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§5, is further amended to read:
G. Earned paid leave; and.
Page 2 - 132LR0764(01)

Sec. 6. 26 MRSA §42-B, sub-§1, ¶H, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §6,
is repealed.
Sec. 7. 26 MRSA c. 7, sub-c. 6-C, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. 8. PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §8 is repealed.
Sec. 9. PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §9 is repealed.
Sec. 10. PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §10 is repealed.
Sec. 11. PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §11 is repealed.
Sec. 12. Department of Labor to refund contributions made by employers
and self-employed individuals under former provision of law. The Department
of Labor shall refund to employers and self-employed individuals contributions made to
the Department of Labor pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 26, section 850-F,
as repealed by this Act. An employer that deducted a portion of the premium required for
an employee from that employee's wages shall remit that portion of the premium to the
employee as part of the employee's wages.
Sec. 13. Transfer from Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund to
General Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June
30, 2025, the State Controller shall transfer all unappropriated funds from the Department
of Labor, Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds
account to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund.
Sec. 14. Retroactivity. That section of this Act that repeals the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 6-C applies retroactively to October 25, 2023.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.